Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 246. LIBERTY COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO HUNTING

Sec. 246.012. DISCHARGE OF FIREARMS. (a) Except as provided in Subsection (b) of this section, no person may shoot a pistol or rifle in, on, along, and across the water of the Trinity River or Wallisville Reservoir in Liberty County.

(b) This section does not apply to peace officers or representatives of the department in the lawful discharge of their duties or to a person hunting migratory waterfowl during an open season in and on the Trinity River and Wallisville Reservoir.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.